Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2309.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 17-12.1-6 and 17-12.1-7 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-12.1
entitled "Primaries for Election of Delegates to National Conventions and for Presidential
Preference" are hereby amended to read as follows:
17-12.1-6. Number of signers required.
The nomination papers of a candidate for delegate to a national convention shall be signed,
in the aggregate, by at least one hundred fifty (150) fifty (50) eligible voters.
17-12.1-7. Checking and certification of nomination papers.
(a) Each nomination paper of a candidate for delegate shall be submitted on or before four
o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the fifty-sixth (56th) fifty-fourth day before the presidential
preference primary to the local board of the city or town where the signers appear to be voters, and
the nomination papers shall be checked, processed, and certified to the secretary of state by the
local boards before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the fifty-third (53rd) day before the
presidential preference primary. In addition, each candidate for delegate to a national convention
may, on or before four o’clock (4:00) p.m. in the afternoon of the fifty-third (53rd) fiftieth day
before the presidential primary, submit to the secretary of state documentation from a candidate, as
set forth in § 17-12.1-4, that he or she has the approval of the candidate for presidential nominee
or approval from the steering/screening committee to name the candidates’ delegates to be
identified with him or her. Names of delegates pledged to a presidential candidate who do not

receive approval of the candidate for presidential nominee or approval from the steering/screening
committee to name the candidates’ delegates to be identified with him/her, who are otherwise
qualified, shall appear on the ballot in accordance with party rules.
(b) When nomination papers have been duly certified by the appropriate local boards of
canvassers, they shall be conclusively presumed to be valid, unless written objections to them are
made as to the eligibility of the candidate or the sufficiency of the nomination papers or the
signatures on them. All objections shall be filed with the state board of elections by four o’clock
(4:00) p.m. on the next business day after the last day fixed for local boards to file nomination
papers with the secretary of state. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the secretary
of state from disqualifying a candidate based on the determination of the secretary of state that the
nomination papers or the signatures on them are invalid or insufficient.
(c) The decision of the state board shall be rendered not later than four o’clock (4:00) p.m.
on the forty-seventh (47th) day before the presidential preference primary and shall immediately
be certified by the state board to the secretary of state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004291
========
LC004291 - Page 2 of 3